Arkansas, session 2025, HB1248.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - OPERATIONS. There is hereby established
for the Arkansas State University - Mid-South for the 2025-2026 fiscal year,
the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item No. of Fiscal Year
No. Title Employees 2025-2026
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ADMINISTRATIVE POSITIONS
(1) Chancellor, ASUMS 1 $208,138
(2) IT Pool 7
Network Engineer $200,973
Information Systems Manager $128,994
*HAR016*
01/27/2025 12:10:41 PM HAR016

HB1248
Computer Network Coordinator $128,780
Technical Support Staff $123,019
Coordinator, Academic Computing $121,571
Coord., Administrative Computing $121,570
Coordinator of Information Technology $119,967
Website Developer/Programmer $119,967
System Programmer/Web Developer $118,592
Computer Systems Mgr. $108,987
Database Administrator $106,607
Systems Administrator $105,547
Information Systems Security Specialist $103,579
Institution Information Technology Coord. $101,489
Assistant Database Administrator $97,665
Computer Support Manager $97,585
Information Systems Coordinator $97,585
Senior Software Support Specialist $97,585
Systems Specialist $97,585
Information Technology Manager $96,408
Network Support Specialist $93,831
Senior Software Support Analyst $93,831
Tech Support/Systems Admin. $92,374
Tech Support/Applications Support $92,374
Information Systems Business Manager $90,223
Security Analyst $90,223
Systems Analyst $90,223
Information Technology Specialist $88,339
Computer Support Coordinator $86,753
Software Support Analyst $86,753
Systems Applications Supervisor $86,753
Computer Operations Coordinator $83,416
Systems Coordination Analyst $83,416
PC Support Specialist $81,860
Computer Support Specialist $80,208
Database Analyst $80,208
Digital Broadcast Specialist $77,123
Network Support Analyst $77,123
01/27/2025 12:10:41 PM HAR016

HB1248
Website Developer $77,123
Information Systems Analyst $74,157
Information Systems Security Analyst $74,157
Computer Support Analyst $74,157
Software Support Specialist $71,305
Telecommunications Supervisor $71,305
Media Specialist $69,975
Computer Support Technician $68,562
Help Desk Specialist $68,562
Computer Operator $65,925
Network Analyst $65,925
Telecommunications Specialist $65,925
Multimedia Specialist $62,208
Information Technology Assistant $58,608
Computer Lab Technician $56,353
Multimedia Technician $51,130
Audiovisual Laboratory Assistant $47,272
(3) Vice Chancellor for Administration 1 $185,738
(4) Vice Chancellor for Academic Affairs 1 $167,057
(5) Vice Chancellor for Finance 1 $156,658
(6) Vice Chancellor for Technical Education 1 $156,658
(7) Vice Chancellor for Student Services 1 $156,658
(8) Chief Information Officer 1 $155,092
(9) Vice Chancellor for Development 1 $152,095
(10) Dir., Occupational and Technical Ed. 1 $135,825
(11) Director of Human Resources/Services 1 $132,733
(12) Director of Institutional Research 1 $132,733
(13) Director of Admin. Services 1 $130,825
(14) Dir. of Workforce Development 1 $129,825
(15) Counselor 4 $127,508
(16) Director of Learning Center 1 $127,508
(17) Controller 1 $126,830
(18) Dir. of PR & Marketing 1 $122,249
(19) Registrar 1 $122,249
(20) Director of Financial Aid 1 $122,005
(21) Dean of Students 1 $121,485
01/27/2025 12:10:41 PM HAR016

HB1248
(22) Project/Program Administrator 1
Project/Program Director $120,919
Project/Program Manager $101,256
Project/Program Specialist $91,408
(23) Dir. of Planning & Assessment 1 $120,919
(24) Director of Computer Services 1 $119,967
(25) Business Manager 1 $117,181
(26) Director of Development 1 $113,455
(27) Director of Physical Plant 1 $113,103
(28) Dir. of Sys Prog. & Database Svcs. 1 $111,761
(29) Director of Enrollment Management 1 $111,453
(30) Dir. of Pub. & Creative Svcs. 1 $111,107
(31) Coordinator for Student Recruitment 1 $108,118
(32) Director of Academic Advising 1 $108,118
(33) Coord., Information & Community Rel. 1 $106,757
(34) Administrator of Grants & Contracts 1 $105,720
(35) Dir. Environ., Health & Safety Prog. 1 $105,037
(36) Coordinator of Career Services 1 $104,457
(37) Assistant Director 2 $104,432
(38) Director of Student Activities 1 $103,585
(39) Assistant to the President 1 $100,487
(40) Workforce Specialist 2 $93,055
(41) Director of Disability Services 1 $92,927
(42) Fiscal Support Pool 10
Fiscal Support Manager $92,082
Fiscal Support Supervisor $75,685
Accountant II $72,774
Accountant I $69,975
Fiscal Support Analyst $67,284
Fiscal Support Specialist $59,815
Accounting Technician $55,302
Fiscal Support Technician $51,130
(43) Maintenance Manager 2 $85,136
(44) Budget Analyst 1 $78,713
(45) Human Resources Analyst 1 $72,774
(46) Maintenance Coordinator 1 $72,774
01/27/2025 12:10:41 PM HAR016

HB1248
(47) ASU Payroll Services Manager 1 $69,975
(48) Administrative Support Pool 10
Administrative Assistant $67,284
Administrative Analyst $67,284
Administrative Support Supervisor $62,208
Administrative Specialist III $59,815
Administration Support Specialist $59,815
Administrative Specialist II $53,175
Administrative Support Specialist $53,175
Administrative Specialist I $47,272
Extra Help Assistant $38,855
(49) Assistant Registrar 1 $67,284
(50) Financial Aid Analyst 2 $67,284
(51) Library Support Pool 1
Library Supervisor $67,284
Library Specialist $57,515
Library Technician $53,175
Library Support Assistant $49,164
(52) Purchasing Specialist 1 $67,284
(53) Financial Aid Specialist 1 $62,208
(54) Human Resources Specialist 2 $62,208
(55) Maintenance Technician 1 $62,208
(56) Maintenance Specialist 3 $59,815
(57) Equipment Mechanic 2 $55,302
(58) Landscape Specialist 2 $55,302
(59) Warehouse Specialist 1 $55,302
(60) Maintenance Assistant 2 $51,130
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ACADEMIC POSITIONS
(61) Faculty 25
Professor/Master Instructor $160,132
Assoc. Professor/Senior Instructor $138,186
Asst. Professor/Advanced Instructor $120,662
Instructor $105,434
(62) Division Chairperson 7 $146,201
(63) Librarian 1 $132,733
01/27/2025 12:10:41 PM HAR016

HB1248
(64) Director of Allied Health 1 $128,588
(65) Director of Adult Education 1 $127,510
(66) Instructor - Nursing/Resp. Therapy 3 $120,305
(67) University Center Media Specialist 1 $88,669
(68) Special Instructor/Trainer 7 $84,321
NINE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ACADEMIC POSITIONS
(69) Faculty 52
Professor/Master Instructor $119,492
Assoc. Professor/Senior Instructor $112,659
Asst. Professor/Advanced Instructor $99,684
Instructor $86,850
(70) Part-Time Faculty 100 $56,046
TWELVE MONTH AUXILIARY ENTERPRISES
POSITIONS
(71) Director of Food Services 1 $105,646
(72) Athletic Administration & Support Pool 3
Coach $104,891
Asst. Coach $56,046
Athletic Trainer $41,956
(73) Food Service Pool 1
Food Preparation Manager $64,696
Food Preparation Supervisor $57,515
Food Preparation Coordinator $51,130
Food Preparation Specialist $43,706
Food Preparation Technician $40,409
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 300

SECTION 2. EXTRA HELP - OPERATIONS. There is hereby authorized, for
the Arkansas State University - Mid-South for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the
following maximum number of part-time or temporary employees, to be known as
"Extra Help", payable from funds appropriated herein for such purposes: two
hundred (200) temporary or part-time employees, when needed, at rates of pay
not to exceed those provided in the Uniform Classification and Compensation
Act, or its successor, or this act for the appropriate classification.

01/27/2025 12:10:41 PM HAR016

HB1248
SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - STATE OPERATIONS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Arkansas State University - Mid-South, to be payable
from the Arkansas State University Mid-South Fund, for personal services and
operating expenses of the Arkansas State University - Mid-South for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $4,000,000
(02) EXTRA HELP 310,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 1,100,000
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 838,903
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(05) CONTINGENCY 312,445
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $6,561,348

SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - CASH FUNDS. There is hereby appropriated,
to the Arkansas State University - Mid-South, to be payable from cash funds
as defined by Arkansas Code 19-4-801, for personal services and operating
expenses of the Arkansas State University - Mid-South for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $7,000,000
(02) EXTRA HELP 600,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 2,500,000
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 5,500,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 300,000
(C) PROF. FEES 1,500,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 1,000,000
01/27/2025 12:10:41 PM HAR016

HB1248
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(05) CAPITAL IMPROVEMENTS 5,000,000
(06) PROMOTIONAL ITEMS 100,000
(07) SUBAWARDEE GRANTS AND AID 1,500,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $25,000,000

SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION - ADTEC/UNIVERSITY CENTER PARTNERS. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Arkansas State University - Mid-South, to be
payable from the Arkansas State University Mid-South Fund, for personal
services, operating expenses, equipment and grants to Arkansas Delta Training
and Education Consortium (ADTEC) Partners and University Center Partners for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) ADTEC/UNIVERSITY CENTER PARTNERS $1,633,890

SECTION 6. ALLOCATIONS - ADTEC/UNIVERSITY CENTER PARTNERS. There is
hereby allocated to the Arkansas Delta Training and Education Consortium
(ADTEC) Partners and University Center Partners the following amounts of the
funds appropriated in the ADTEC/University Center Partners Appropriation of
this Act, there to be used as provided by in this Act, for the period ending
June 30, 2026, the following:

MAXIMUM ALLOCATION
ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(1) ARKANSAS NORTHEASTERN COLLEGE $171,103
(2) ARKANSAS STATE UNIVERSITY - NEWPORT 171,103
(3) UNIV. OF ARK. EAST ARKANSAS COMMUNITY COLLEGE 223,924
(4) ARKANSAS STATE UNIVERSITY - MID-SOUTH 436,878
(5) PHILLIPS COMMUNITY COLLEGE OF THE UA 197,930
(6) ARKANSAS STATE UNIVERSITY - JONESBORO 335,312
(7) UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS AT FORT SMITH 97,640
TOTAL AMOUNT ALLOCATED $1,633,890

01/27/2025 12:10:41 PM HAR016

HB1248
SECTION 7. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
ADTEC/UNIVERSITY CENTER PARTNERS - TRAINING CONSORTIUM ADVICE. The Arkansas
State University Mid-South upon counsel with and advice from the Arkansas
Delta Training and Education Consortium (ADTEC) shall disburse funds from the
ADTEC/UNIVERSITY CENTER PARTNERS appropriation authorized in this Act to
selected University Center Partners and also the participating ADTEC
Partners.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 8. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, the Higher Education Expenditure Restriction
Act, or their successors, and other fiscal control laws of this State, where
applicable, and regulations promulgated by the Department of Finance and
Administration, as authorized by law, shall be strictly complied with in
disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 9. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 10. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits
the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
01/27/2025 12:10:41 PM HAR016

HB1248
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.






























01/27/2025 12:10:41 PM HAR016